Massachusetts, session 194th, S1215.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph D of said section 99 of said chapter 272, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by the insertion of the following language as subparagraph (1) (g): for any
person to commit and interception, attempt to commit an interception or procure another to
commit or attempt an interception, or to aid and abet or jointly commit or attempt to commit or
procure an interception of any communication made by another to the person making the
interception in circumstances under which the interception is made in order to make a record of
threats, harassment, or other crimes in relation to divorce or child custody matters or in relation
to orders issued under Chapter 209A or 258E.
of 2

SECTION 2. Paragraph D of said section 99 of said chapter 272 as so appearing, is
hereby amended by insertion of the following language as subparagraph (2) (f) Any person who
has committed an interception of any communication made by another in circumstances under
which the interception is made to make a record of threats, harassment, or other crimes in
relation to divorce or custody matters or in relation to orders issued under Chapter 209A or 258E
may disclose said recording.
SECTION 3. Paragraph D of said section 99 of said chapter 272, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by the insertion of the following language as subparagraph (2) (g) Any person
who has committed an interception of any communication made by another in circumstances
under which the interception is made in order to make a record of threats, harassment, or other
crimes in relation to divorce or child custody matters, or in relation to orders issued under
Chapter 209A or 258E bears the burden of proof, in a prosecution for such interception, or
attempt, or procurement of such interception, or for disclosure of such interception, to
demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that said conduct was exempt or permitted
under this section.
of 2